West Virginia, session 2026, SB265.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Department of Environmental PRotection to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Department of Environmental Protection. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §22-11-10 of this code, modified by Department of Environmental Protection to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on December 29, 2025 relating to the Department of Environmental Protection (carbon dioxide sequestration fee schedule, 47 CSR 09B), is authorized.